Utah statutes.
67-19e-108.   Administrative Law Judge Conduct Committee.

(1)  There is created the Administrative Law Judge Conduct Committee to investigate, review, and hear complaints filed against administrative law judges.

(2)  The committee shall be composed of:

(a)  the executive director of the department, or the executive director's designee, as chair; and

(b)  four executive directors, or their designees, of agencies that employ or contract with administrative law judges, to be selected by the executive director as needed.

(3)  The department shall provide staff for the committee as needed.



Enacted by Chapter 165, 2013 General Session

